Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.010

Declaration of police power and purpose.

The application and the control of the use of various pesticides is important and vital to the maintenance of a high level of public health and welfare both immediate and future, and is hereby declared to be affected with the public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police power of the state for the purpose of protecting the immediate and future health and welfare of the people of the state.

[ 1967 c 177 s 1; 1961 c 249 s 1.]

NOTES:

Washington pesticide control act: Chapter 15.58 RCW.